Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3011
Digital asset depository; notice and statement regarding insurance and risk; customer; acknowledgment.

(1) With respect to all digital asset business activities, a digital asset depository shall display and include in all advertising, in all marketing materials, on any Internet website or mobile application it maintains, and at each window or place where it accepts digital asset deposits, (a) a notice conspicuously stating that digital asset deposits and digital asset accounts are not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, if applicable, and (b) the following conspicuous statement: Holdings of digital assets are speculative and involve a substantial degree of risk, including the risk of complete loss. There is no assurance that any digital asset will be viable, liquid, or solvent. Nothing in this communication is intended to imply that any digital asset held in custody by a digital asset depository is low-risk or risk-free. Digital assets held in custody are not guaranteed by a digital asset depository and are not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(2) Upon opening a digital asset depository account, a digital asset depository shall require each customer to execute a statement acknowledging that all digital asset deposits at the digital asset depository are not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. The digital asset depository shall permanently retain this acknowledgment, whether in electronic form or as a signature card.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 11;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 25.